Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202121-504
Powers and duration of protected series.

(a) A protected series of a series limited liability company has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a protected series of a series limited liability company has the same powers and purposes as the company.

(c) A protected series of a series limited liability company ceases to exist not later than when the company completes its winding up.

(d) A protected series of a series limited liability company may not:

(1) be a member of the company;

(2) establish a protected series;

(3) render a professional service; or

(4) except as permitted by law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act, have a purpose or power that the law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act prohibits a limited liability company from doing or having.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB253, § 2.
July 1, 2021